District of Columbia statutes.
42-515

Expectant estates — Descendible, devisable, and alienable.

Expectant estates shall be descendible, devisable, and alienable in the same manner as estates in possession.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1352, ch. 854, § 1030

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-215.
1973 Ed., § 45-815.